Maine, session 132, LD437.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4017 is enacted to read:
§4017. Pilot programs to establish child care facilities in public schools
The department shall conduct a study to place child care facilities in public schools for
infants, toddlers and preschool-aged children. Based on the study, the department shall
develop and implement pilot programs in at least 8 school administrative units. Pilot
programs developed pursuant to this section must be operational no later than the first day
of the 2026-2027 school year.
1. Duration. Pilot programs established pursuant to this section must be designed to
last 6 years.
2. Reports. The department shall submit to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters the following reports.
A. No later than November 4, 2026, the department shall submit a report detailing the
findings of the study, including any recommendations for legislation and information
about the pilot programs established, including the initial progress of those programs.
The committee may report out legislation based on the report to the 133rd Legislature
in 2027.
B. No later than December 5, 2029, the department shall submit an interim report
detailing the progress of the program and any findings related to the program, including
any recommendations for legislation. The committee may report out legislation based
on the report to the Second Regular Session of the 134th Legislature.
C. No later than November 3, 2032, the department shall submit a final report detailing
the progress of the program and any findings related to the program, including any
recommendations for legislation. The committee may report out legislation based on
the report to the 136th Legislature in 2033.
Sec. 2. Pilot programs placing child care facilities in public schools;
purposes. The Department of Education shall develop pilot programs to place child care
facilities in public schools pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, section 4017
to serve the following purposes:
1. Providing an early childhood education course in child development combined with
hands-on training for 11th and 12th grade public school students and child care courses
involving the developmental stages of infants, toddlers and preschool-aged children;
2. Providing nurturing quality child care and age-appropriate learning experiences in a
safe and secure environment for infants, toddlers and preschool-aged children;
3. Providing quality child care for children of all public school staff and employees
during employment hours;
4. Creating a source of early childhood educators and caregivers to help reduce the
shortage of child care workers in the State; and
5. Being organized for and focusing on the needs of the children and parents receiving
the services and the students, staff and employees of the public school.
Page 1 - 132LR0753(01)

Sec. 3. Pilot programs placing child care facilities in public schools;
program characteristics to consider in developing programs. In developing pilot
programs to place child care facilities in public schools pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 20-A, section 4017, the Department of Education shall study potential
characteristics for child care facilities in public schools, including:
1. Serving infants, toddlers and preschool-aged children of public school staff and
employees;
2. Being staffed by a qualified child care educator who is hired by the school
administrative unit of the public school and receives full state benefits as an employee of
the school;
3. Serving as a classroom to provide hands-on experience as part of an early childhood
education and development course or curriculum for students in grades 11 and 12 and adult
education students, with a certificate awarded at graduation to a student who has completed
2 years of study in the course or curriculum;
4. Providing child care to children of students and others in the community if space is
available once all children under subsection 1 have been served;
5. Providing child care to children in the community whose family's household income
is at or below the federal poverty level;
6. Charging a fee for child care, which may be adjusted based upon the income of the
parent or guardian of the child, based upon recommendations of the Department of
Education and other child care service providers, and accepting a child care voucher or
other child care assistance;
7. Providing child care for free or at a discount to a public school staff member or
employee as an employment incentive or benefit;
8. Operating from 7 a.m. to 5 p.m. on school days, coordinated with the school year, or
year-round and on holidays or weekend days or operating in conjunction with the course
schedules of adult education students who are enrolled in a course or curriculum to receive
a certificate under subsection 3; and
9. Determining adequate space, staffing and resources to provide a quality child care
service.